District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-530

Lessor’s incidental damages.

Incidental damages to an aggrieved lessor include any commercially reasonable charges, expenses, or commissions incurred in stopping delivery, in the transportation, care and custody of goods after the lessee’s default, in connection with return or disposition of the goods, or otherwise resulting from the default.

History

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28:2A-527, § 28:2A-528, and § 28:2A-529.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-530.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-710.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Definitional Cross References: “Aggrieved party”. Section 1-201(2).

“Delivery”. Section 1-201(14).

“Goods”. Section 2A-103(1)(h).

“Lessee”. Section 2A-103(1)(n).

“Lessor”. Section 2A-103(1)(p).